Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 36 Risk Retention

§ 26-36-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Risk Retention Act”.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

§ 26-36-102.
Purpose.

The purpose of this act is to regulate the formation and operation of risk retention groups in this state formed pursuant to the provisions of the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-36-103(a)(xiii).

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in this section, appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.

§ 26-36-103.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of insurance of this state or the commissioner, director or superintendent of insurance in any other state;

“Completed operations liability” means liability arising out of the installation, maintenance or repair of any product at a site which is not owned or controlled by any person who performs that work, or any person who hires an independent contractor to perform that work, but includes liability for activities which are completed or abandoned before the date of the occurrence giving rise to the liability;

“Domicile” for purposes of determining the state in which a purchasing group is domiciled, means:

For a corporation, the state in which the purchasing group is incorporated; and

For an unincorporated entity, the state of its principal place of business.

“Hazardous financial condition” means that, based on its present or reasonably anticipated financial condition, a risk retention group, although not yet financially impaired or insolvent, is unlikely to be able:

To meet obligations to policyholders with respect to known claims and reasonably anticipated claims; or

To pay other obligations in the normal course of business.

“Insurance” means primary insurance, excess insurance, reinsurance, surplus lines insurance and any other arrangement for shifting and distributing risk which is determined to be insurance under the laws of this state;

“Liability” as used in the act means legal liability for damages including costs of defense, legal costs and fees, and other claims or expenses because of injuries to other persons, damage to their property, or other damage or loss to such other persons resulting from or arising out of any business whether profit or nonprofit, trade, product, services including professional services, premises or operations, or any activity of any state or local government, or any agency or political subdivision thereof except, the term does not include personal risk liability or an employer’s liability with respect to its employees other than legal liability under the Federal Employers’ Liability Act (45 U.S.C. § 51 et seq.);

“Personal risk liability” means liability for damages because of injury to any person, damage to property or other loss or damage resulting from any personal, familial or household responsibilities or activities, rather than from responsibilities or activities referred to in subsection (vi) of this section;

“Plan of operation or a feasibility study” means an analysis which presents the expected activities and results of a risk retention group including, at a minimum:

The coverages, deductibles, coverage limits, rates and rating classification systems for each line of insurance the group intends to offer;

Historical and expected loss experience of the proposed members and national experience of similar exposures to the extent that this experience is reasonably available;

Pro forma financial statements and projections;

Appropriate opinions by a qualified, independent casualty actuary, including a determination of minimum premium or participation levels required to commence operations and to prevent a hazardous financial condition;

Identification of management, underwriting procedures, managerial oversight methods and investment policies; and

Such other matters as may be prescribed by the commissioner for liability insurance companies authorized by the insurance laws of the state in which the risk retention group is chartered.

“Product liability” means liability for damages because of any personal injury, death, emotional harm, consequential economic damage or property damage including damages resulting from the loss of use of property arising out of the manufacture, design, importation, distribution, packaging, labeling, lease or sale of a product, but does not include the liability of any person for those damages if the product involved was in the possession of such a person when the incident giving rise to the claim occurred;

“Purchasing group” means any group which:

Has as one (1) of its purposes the purchase of liability insurance on a group basis;

Purchases such insurance only for its group members and only to cover their similar or related liability exposure, as described in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph;

Is composed of members whose businesses or activities are similar or related with respect to the liability to which members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar or common business, trade, product, services, premises or operations; and

Is domiciled in any state.

“Risk retention group” means any corporation or other limited liability association formed under the laws of any state, Bermuda or the Cayman Islands:

Whose primary activity consists of assuming and spreading all or any portion of the liability exposure of its group members;

Which is organized for the primary purpose of conducting the activity described under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph;

Which is chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company and authorized to engage in the business of insurance under the laws of any state, or before January 1, 1985 was chartered or licensed and authorized to engage in the business of insurance under the laws of Bermuda or the Cayman Islands and, before such date, had certified to the insurance commissioner of at least one (1) state that it satisfied the capitalization requirements of such state, except that any such group shall be considered to be a risk retention group only if it has been engaged in business continuously since such date and only for the purpose of continuing to provide insurance to cover product liability or completed operations liability as such terms were defined in the Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981 before the date of the enactment of the Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986;

Which does not exclude any person from membership in the group solely to provide for members of such a group a competitive advantage over such a person;

Which has as its members only persons who have an ownership interest in the group and which has as its owners only persons who are members who are provided insurance by the risk retention group, or has as its sole member and sole owner an organization which is owned by persons who are provided insurance by the risk retention group;

Whose members are engaged in businesses or activities similar or related to the liability of which such members are exposed by virtue of any related, similar or common business trade, product, services, premises or operations;

Whose activities do not include the provision of insurance other than liability insurance for assuming and spreading all or any portion of the liability of its group members and reinsurance with respect to the liability of any other risk retention group or any members of such other group which is engaged in businesses or activities so that such group or member meets the requirement described in subparagraph (F) of this paragraph from membership in the risk retention group which provides such reinsurance;

The name of which includes the phrase “Risk Retention Group”.

“State” means any state of the United States or the District of Columbia;

“This act” means W.S.

26-36-101

through

26-36-116

.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1; 1991, ch. 111, § 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

inserted “§ 51” in (a)(vi).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in subsection (a)(xi)(C), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq. The 1986 amendments to the act, also referred to in that subsection, were effective October 27, 1986.

§ 26-36-104.
Risk retention groups chartered in this state.

A risk retention group seeking to be chartered in this state must be chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company authorized by the insurance laws of this state and, except as provided elsewhere in this act, must comply with all of the laws, rules, regulations and requirements applicable to such insurers chartered and licensed in this state and with W.S.

26-36-106

to the extent such requirements are not a limitation on laws, rules, regulations or requirements of this state. Before it may offer insurance in any state, each risk retention group shall also submit for approval to the insurance commissioner of this state a plan of operation or a feasibility study and revisions of such plan or study if the group intends to offer any additional lines of liability insurance. Immediately upon receipt of an application for charter, this state shall provide summary information concerning the filing to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, including the name of the risk retention group, the identity of the initial members of the group, the identity of those individuals who organized the group or who will provide administrative services or otherwise influence or control the activities of the group, the amount and nature of initial capitalization, the coverages to be afforded and the states in which the group intends to operate. Providing notification to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners is in addition to and shall not be sufficient to satisfy the requirements of W.S.

26-36-106

and all other sections of this act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-36-103(a)(xiii).

§ 26-36-105.
Risk retention groups not chartered in this state.

Risk retention groups chartered in states other than this state and seeking to do business as a risk retention group in this state must observe and abide by the laws of this state.

Before offering insurance in this state, a risk retention group shall submit to the commissioner:

A statement identifying the state or states in which the risk retention group is chartered and licensed as a liability insurance company, date of chartering, its principal place of business and such other information, including information on its membership, as the commissioner of this state may require to verify that the risk retention group is qualified under W.S. 26-36-103(a)(xi);

A copy of its plan of operations or a feasibility study and revisions of such plan or study submitted to its state of domicile, except that the provision relating to the submission of a plan of operation or a feasibility study shall not apply with respect to any line or classification of liability insurance which:

Was defined in the Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981 before October 27, 1986; and

Was offered before such date by any risk retention group which had been chartered and operating for not less than three (3) years before such date.

A statement of registration which designates the commissioner as its agent for the purpose of receiving service of legal documents or process.

Any risk retention group doing business in this state shall submit the following documentation of financial condition to the commissioner:

A copy of the group’s financial statement submitted to its state of domicile, which shall be certified by an independent public accountant and contain a statement of opinion on loss and loss adjustment expense reserves made by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries or a qualified loss reserve specialist under criteria established by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners;

A copy of each examination of the risk retention group as certified by the commissioner or public official conducting the examination;

Upon request by the commissioner, a copy of any audit performed with respect to the risk retention group; and

Such information as may be required to verify its continuing qualification as a risk retention group under W.S. 26-36-103(a)(xi).

All premiums paid for coverages within this state to risk retention groups shall be subject to taxation at the same rate and subject to the same interest, fines and penalties for nonpayment as that applicable to foreign admitted insurers. To the extent agents or brokers are utilized, they shall report and pay the taxes for the premiums for risks which they have placed with or on behalf of a risk retention group not chartered in this state. To the extent agents or brokers are not utilized or fail to pay the tax, each risk retention group shall pay the tax for risks insured within the state. Further, each risk retention group shall report all premiums paid to it for risks insured within the state.

Any risk retention group, its agents and representatives shall comply with the law governing unfair claims settlement practices, W.S.

26-13-124

.

Any risk retention group shall comply with the laws of this state regarding deceptive, false or fraudulent acts or practices. If the commissioner seeks an injunction regarding such conduct, the injunction must be obtained from a court of competent jurisdiction.

Any risk retention group must submit to an examination by the commissioner to determine its financial condition if the commissioner of the jurisdiction in which the group is chartered has not initiated an examination or does not initiate an examination within sixty (60) days after a request by the commissioner of this state. Any such examination shall be coordinated to avoid unjustified repetition and conducted in an expeditious manner and in accordance with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Examiner Handbook.

Any policy issued by a risk retention group shall contain in ten point type on the front page and the declaration page, the following notice:

NOTICE This policy is issued by your risk retention group. Your risk retention group may not be subject to all of the insurance laws and regulations of your state. State insurance insolvency guaranty funds are not available for your risk retention group.

Click to view

The following acts by a risk retention group are hereby prohibited:

The solicitation or sale of insurance by a risk retention group to any person who is not eligible for membership in such group; and

The solicitation or sale of insurance by, or operation of, a risk retention group that is in a hazardous financial condition or is financially impaired.

No risk retention group shall be allowed to do business in this state if an insurance company is directly or indirectly a member or owner of such risk retention group, other than in the case of a risk retention group all of whose members are insurance companies.

A risk retention group not chartered in this state and doing business in this state must comply with a lawful order issued in a voluntary dissolution proceeding or in a delinquency proceeding commenced by a state insurance commissioner if there has been a finding of financial impairment after an examination under subsection (g) of this section.

No risk retention group may offer insurance policy coverage prohibited by this code or declared unlawful by the highest court of this state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this code.” —

The reference in subsection (n) to “this code” apparently means the Insurance Code, i.e., this title.

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in subsection (b)(ii)(A), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.

§ 26-36-106.
Compulsory associations.

No risk retention group shall be permitted to join or contribute financially to any insurance insolvency guaranty fund or similar mechanism in this state, nor shall any risk retention group or its insureds receive any benefit from any such fund for claims arising out of the operations of such risk retention group.

A risk retention group shall participate in this state’s joint underwriting associations and mandatory liability pools as provided by this act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-36-103(a)(xiii).

§ 26-36-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 19, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1, related to countersignatures.

§ 26-36-108.
Purchasing groups; exemption from certain laws relating to the group purchase of insurance.

Any purchasing group meeting the criteria established under the provisions of the federal Liability Risk Retention Act of 1986 shall be exempt from any law of this state relating to the creation of groups for the purchase of insurance, prohibition of group purchasing or any law that would discriminate against a purchasing group or its members. In addition, an insurer shall be exempt from any law of this state which prohibits providing, or offering to provide, to a purchasing group or its members advantages based on their loss and expense experience not afforded to other persons with respect to rates, policy forms, coverages or other matters. A purchasing group shall be subject to all other applicable laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in the first sentence, appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.

§ 26-36-109.
Notice and registration requirements of purchasing groups.

A purchasing group which intends to do business in this state shall furnish notice to the commissioner which shall:

Identify the state in which the group is domiciled;

Specify the lines and classifications of liability insurance which the purchasing group intends to purchase;

Identify the insurance company from which the group intends to purchase its insurance and the domicile of such company;

Identify the principal place of business of the group; and

Provide such other information as may be required by the commissioner to verify that the purchasing group is qualified under W.S. 26-36-103(a)(x).

The purchasing group shall register with and designate the commissioner as its agent solely for the purpose of receiving service of legal documents or process, except that such requirements shall not apply in the case of a purchasing group:

Which was domiciled before April 1, 1986, and is domiciled on and after October 27, 1986 in any state of the United States;

Which before October 27, 1986 purchased insurance from an insurance carrier licensed in any state, and since October 27, 1986 purchased its insurance from an insurance carrier licensed in any state;

Which was a purchasing group under the requirements of the Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981 before October 27, 1986; and

Which does not purchase insurance that was not authorized for purposes of an exemption under that act, as in effect before October 27, 1986.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in subsection (b)(iii), appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.

§ 26-36-110.
Restrictions on insurance purchased by purchasing groups.

A purchasing group may not purchase insurance from a risk retention group that is not chartered in a state or from an insurer not admitted in the state in which the purchasing group is located unless the purchase is effected through a licensed agent or broker acting pursuant to the surplus lines laws and regulations of such state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

§ 26-36-111.
Administrative and procedural authority regarding risk retention groups and purchasing groups.

The commissioner is authorized to make use of any of the powers established under the Insurance Code [this title] of this state to enforce the laws of this state so long as those powers are not specifically preempted by the Product Liability Risk Retention Act of 1981, as amended by the Risk Retention Amendments of 1986. This includes, but is not limited to, the commissioner’s administrative authority to investigate, issue subpoenas, conduct depositions and hearings, issue orders and impose penalties. With regard to any investigation, administrative proceedings or litigation, the commissioner can rely on the procedural law and regulations of the state. The injunctive authority of the commissioner in regard to risk retention groups is restricted by the requirement that any injunction be issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Product Liability Risk Retention Act. —

The federal Product Liability Risk Retention Act, referred to in the first sentence, appears as 15 U.S.C. § 3901 et seq.

§ 26-36-112.
Penalties.

A risk retention group which violates any provision of this act will be subject to fines and penalties applicable to licensed insurers generally, including revocation of its license and the right to do business in this state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-36-103(a)(xiii).

§ 26-36-113.
Duty of agents or brokers to obtain license.

Any person acting or offering to act as an agent or broker for a risk retention group or purchasing group which solicits members, sells insurance coverage, purchases coverage for its members located within the state or otherwise does business in this state shall, before commencing any such activity, obtain a license from the commissioner pursuant to the laws of this state except that no restrictions as to residency which discriminate against a nonresident agent or broker shall apply to risk retention agents or brokers.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

§ 26-36-114.
Binding effect of orders issued in United States district court.

An order issued by any district court of the United States enjoining a risk retention group from soliciting or selling insurance or operating in any state or in all states or in any territory or possession of the United States upon a finding that such a group is in a hazardous financial condition shall be enforceable in the courts of this state.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

§ 26-36-115.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner may establish and from time to time amend such rules relating to risk retention groups as may be necessary to implement the provisions of the act.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 74, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[this] act,” referred to in this section, see § 26-36-103(a)(xiii).

§ 26-36-116.
Registration fee.

Each risk retention group or risk purchasing group seeking to do business in the state of Wyoming shall pay a registration fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00), which shall accompany the required registration application. Each risk retention group or risk purchasing group doing business in Wyoming shall be required to pay an annual fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00) payable on or before March 1 of each year to renew its registration.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 111, § 1.